Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9408
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Assisting Caregiver Transitions Act.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 14.